activities/make/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
@U.reg.rur@:@U.reg.rur@a- Verb_entries ;
Verb_entries ;

LEXICON Verb_entries
walk V ;
talk V ;
pack V ;
t V-each-aught ; ! teach+V+Past:taught

LEXICON V-each-aught
@U.reg.std@each+V+Pres+3Sg:@U.reg.std@eaches # ;
@U.reg.std@each+V+Pres:@U.reg.std@each       # ;
@U.reg.std@each+V+Past:@U.reg.std@aught      # ;
+PresPtc:eaching  # ;

LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

LEXICON V-suff
@U.reg.std@ V_std ;
V_rur ;

LEXICON V_std
+Pres+3Sg:s   # ;
+Past:ed      # ;
+PresPtc:ing  # ;
+Pres:        # ;

LEXICON V_rur
+PresPtc+Use/rural:ing # ;
